Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WHITE EARTH NATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the White Earth Nation to build a cultural center for the White Earth Tribal Community. new text end